District of Columbia statutes.
25-797

Limitation on transfer of responsibility for licensee security.

(a)

The holder of an on-premises retailer’s license may rent out or provide the licensed establishment for use by a third party or promoter for a specific event; provided, that the licensee maintains ownership and control of the licensed establishment for the duration of the event, including modes of ingress or egress, and the staff of the establishment, including bar and security staff.

(b)

Under no circumstances shall a licensee permit the third party or promoter to be responsible for providing security or maintain control over the establishment’s existing security personnel.

(c)

A violation of this section shall constitute a primary tier violation under section 25-830(c)(1).

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-201, § 5(f), 55 DCR 6289